Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,165
By whom brought; jurisdiction.

Whenever a suit praying for an interlocutory injunction shall have been begun in the United States District Court in any Division in the State of Nebraska to restrain any official or officials of the State of Nebraska from enforcing or administering any statute of the State of Nebraska, or from enforcing or administering any administrative order of any department, bureau or commission of this state, or to set aside or enjoin such statute or administrative order, any defendant in such suit or the Attorney General of the State of Nebraska may bring an action to enforce said statute or order in the district court of the county of the State of Nebraska in which the State Capitol of said state is located at any time before the hearing or application for said interlocutory injunction in the suit in the United States District Court, District of Nebraska, in the proper Division thereof; and jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the district court of the county of the State of Nebraska in which its State Capitol is located to entertain such suit with the powers hereinafter granted.

Laws 1929, c. 79, § 1, p. 268;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,156;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,165.